California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The department shall not issue any new COVID-19 Temporary Catering Authorizations on or after January 1, 2027. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department determines that any licensee is found to be abusing the relief provided by this section, or if the licensee’s actions jeopardize public health, safety, or welfare, the department may summarily rescind
 the relief as to that licensee at any time.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 569, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.   (AB 592)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25751.

For the performance of its duties the department has the power conferred by Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

25752.

No licensee may manufacture, import, sell or distribute alcoholic beverages, except wine, in the State of California unless he keeps records at his licensed premises of such manufacture, importation, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages manufactured, imported, sold or distributed by the licensee in this State. Such records shall include all expenditures incurred by the licensee in the manufacture, importation, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages, except wine, in this State. Provided, however, that any licensee licensed at more than one premises may keep all said records at one of his licensed premises. Records herein required to be kept shall be kept for a
 period of three years from the date of the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1357.)
-------------------------------------------

25753.

The department may make any examination of the books and records of any licensee or other person and may visit and inspect the premises of any licensee it may deem necessary to perform its duties under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

25754.

The director and the persons employed by the department for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this division may administer and certify oaths in the administration and enforcement of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25755.

(a) The director and the persons employed by the department for the administration and enforcement of this division are peace officers in the enforcement of the penal provisions of this division, the rules of the department adopted under the provisions of this division, and any other penal provisions of law of this state prohibiting or regulating the sale, exposing for sale, use, possession, giving away, adulteration, dilution, misbranding, or mislabeling of alcoholic beverages or intoxicating liquors, and these persons are authorized, while
 acting as peace officers, to enforce any penal provisions of law while in the course of their employment.

(b) The director, the persons employed by the department for the administration and enforcement of this division, peace officers listed in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, and those officers listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code while acting in the course and scope of their employment as peace officers may, in enforcing the provisions of this division, visit and inspect the premises of any licensee at any time during which the licensee is exercising the privileges authorized by his or her license on the premises.

(c) Peace officers of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, members of the University of California and California State University police departments, and peace officers of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in subdivisions (a), (b),
 (c), and (f) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code, may, in enforcing this division, visit and inspect the premises of any licensee located on state property at any time during which the licensee is exercising the privileges authorized by his or her license on the premises.

(d) Any agents assigned to the Drug Enforcement Narcotics Team by the director shall have successfully completed a four-week course on narcotics enforcement approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. In addition, all other agents of the department shall successfully complete the four-week course on narcotics enforcement approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training by June 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

25757.

The department may authorize any of its executive officers to join or subscribe to any national association or service having as its purpose the gathering and supply of information relative to the technique of liquor regulation, control, or administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25758.

When a person attends as a witness in any criminal case in which a person is charged with a violation of any penal provisions of the law prohibiting or regulating the sale, exposing for sale, use, possession, giving away, adulteration, dilution, misbranding, or mislabeling of an alcoholic beverage or intoxicating liquor, and the court in the exercise of its discretion does not authorize the payment of the witness from county funds under Section 1329 of the Penal Code, the department may expend any money available to it to pay him witness fees at the rate of three dollars ($3) for each day’s actual attendance and a reasonable sum for the necessary expenses of the witness, or,
 in the case of a witness attending from outside the State, to pay the witness the sum of ten cents ($0.10) for each mile and five dollars ($5) for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25758.5.

In any hearing before the department pursuant to Section 24300, the department may pay any person appearing as a witness at the hearing at the request of the department pursuant to a subpoena, his or her actual, necessary, and reasonable travel, food, and lodging expenses, not to exceed the amount authorized for state employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 774, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25759.

When license fees are required to be paid on or by specified dates, they shall be deemed to have been paid at the time they are filed with or paid to the department or other proper official or, if sent by mail, on the date shown by the United States postmark on the envelope containing the payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

25760.

Notice of any act of the department required by this division to be given may be signed and given by the director or an authorized employee of the department and may be made personally or by mail. If made by mail, service shall be made in the manner prescribed by Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In case of service by mail, the service is complete at the time of deposit in the United States Post Office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

25761.

All money collected as fees pursuant to this division, as payments under Section 23096, and under the excise tax provisions of this division or Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund, which fund is continued in existence.

The money in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund shall be expended as follows:

(a) The amount necessary for the allowance of the refunds provided for in this division or Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Controller for payment of these
 refunds.

(b) All money derived as payment under Section 23096 and from excise taxes under Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code remaining after compliance with subdivision (a) shall be transferred to the General Fund on the order of the Controller.

(c) All original license fees paid on or after July 1, 1998, shall remain in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(d) All other money collected as fees and deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund shall be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for the enforcement and administration of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

(e) Money transferred to the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be
 in lieu of any assessment that would be made on the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control pursuant to Section 11270 and following of the Government Code.

(f) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the amount necessary for the support of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control’s grant assistance program. This amount shall be sufficient to cover the salaries and benefits of the alcohol beverage control peace officer positions dedicated to this program. However, based on the available revenue in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund, the amount shall not be less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) and not more than three million dollars ($3,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 73.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25762.

(a) All fines and forfeitures of bail imposed for a violation of this division and collected in any felony case after the indictment or the legal commitment by a magistrate, or at or after the sentencing hearing, shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county in which the court is held.

(b) All fines and forfeitures of bail imposed for
 violation of this division and collected upon conviction or upon forfeiture of bail, together with money deposited as bail, in any misdemeanor or infraction case, or in any felony case at the preliminary hearing or at another proceeding before the legal commitment by a magistrate, shall be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which the court is situated and the money deposited shall be distributed and disposed of pursuant to Section 1463 of the Penal Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, a case in which both a felony and a misdemeanor were charged shall be treated as a felony case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.   (AB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. CANNABIS [26000. - 26325.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [26000. - 26002.]

26000.

(a) This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Medicinal and Adult-Use Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act.

(b) The purpose and intent of this division is to establish a comprehensive system to control and regulate the cultivation, distribution, transport, storage, manufacturing, processing, and sale of both of the following:

(1) Medicinal cannabis and medicinal cannabis products for patients with valid physician’s recommendations.

(2) Adult-use cannabis and adult-use cannabis products for adults 21 years of age and
 over and cannabis products intended for use on, or consumption by, animals.

(c) In the furtherance of subdivision (b), this division sets forth the power and duties of the state agencies responsible for controlling and regulating the commercial medicinal and adult-use cannabis industry.

(d) The Legislature may, by majority vote, enact laws to implement this division, provided those laws are consistent with the purposes and intent of the Control, Regulate and Tax Adult Use of Marijuana Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 389, Sec. 3.   (AB 1885)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26000.5.

Until January 1, 2028, both of the following shall apply:

(a) A licensed manufacturer shall only use cannabinoid concentrates and extracts that are manufactured or processed exclusively from cannabis obtained from a licensed cannabis cultivator.

(b) A licensee shall not possess, transport, distribute, manufacture, or sell industrial hemp on or from a licensed premises, except that a licensed testing laboratory may test industrial hemp.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26001.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “A-license” means a state license issued under this division for cannabis or cannabis products that are intended for adults who are 21 years of age and older and who do not possess a physician’s recommendation, or are intended for use on, or consumption by, animals.

(b) “A-licensee” means any person holding a license under this division for cannabis or cannabis products that are intended for adults who are 21 years of age and older and who do not possess a physician’s recommendation, or are intended for use on, or consumption by, animals.

(c) “Animal” does not include a food animal as
 defined in Section 4825.1 or livestock as defined in Section 14205 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(d) “Applicant” means an owner applying for a state license pursuant to this division.

(e) “Batch” means a specific quantity of homogeneous cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product that is one of the following types:

(1) “Harvest batch” means a specifically identified quantity of dried flower or trim, leaves, and other plant matter from either cannabis or industrial hemp that is harvested at the same time, and, if applicable, cultivated using the same pesticides and other agricultural chemicals.

(2) “Manufactured cannabis batch” means either of the following:

(A) An amount of
 cannabis concentrate or extract that is produced in one production cycle using the same extraction methods and standard operating procedures.

(B) An amount of a type of manufactured cannabis produced in one production cycle using the same formulation and standard operating procedures.

(f) “Cannabinoid” means a chemical compound found in cannabis and industrial hemp that binds to or otherwise activates cannabinoid receptors in humans and animals. “Cannabinoid” includes, but is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and cannabidiol (CBD).

(g) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as in Section 11018 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Cannabis accessories” has the same meaning as in Section 11018.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) “Cannabis beverage” means a form of edible cannabis product that is intended to be consumed in its final state as a beverage.

(j) “Cannabis concentrate” has the same meaning as in Section 11006.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) “Cannabis event organizer” means a person authorized to plan and organize temporary cannabis events as authorized in Section 26200.

(l) “Cannabis products” has the same meaning as in Section 11018.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(m) “CBD isolate” means a compound extracted from cannabis or industrial hemp consisting of cannabidiol (CAS number 13956-29-1), with a purity level greater than 99 percent and that does not contain any form of
 tetrahydrocannabinol or synthetic cannabinoid.

(n) “CBN isolate” means a compound extracted from cannabis or industrial hemp consisting of cannabinol (CAS number 521-35-7), with a purity level greater than 99 percent, and that does not contain any form of tetrahydrocannabinol or synthetic cannabinoid.

(o) “Child resistant” means designed or constructed to be significantly difficult for children under five years of age to open, and not difficult for normal adults to use properly.

(p) “Combined activities license” means a state license that authorizes two or more commercial cannabis activities at the same premises, with the exception of laboratory testing. A combined activities license shall conform with all requirements imposed by this division to the extent the licensee engages in those activities.

(q) “Commercial cannabis activity” includes the cultivation of cannabis or the possession, manufacture, distribution, processing, storing, laboratory testing, packaging, labeling, transportation, delivery, or sale of cannabis and cannabis products as provided for in this division, or acting as a cannabis event organizer for temporary cannabis events.

(r) “Cultivation” means any activity involving the planting, growing, harvesting, drying, curing, grading, or trimming of cannabis.

(s) “Cultivation site” means a location where cannabis is planted, grown, harvested, dried, cured, graded, or trimmed, or a location where any combination of those activities occurs.

(t) “Customer” means a natural person 21 years of age or older or a natural person 18 years of age
 or older who possesses a physician’s recommendation, or a primary caregiver.

(u) “Daycare center” has the same meaning as in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code.

(v) “Delivery” means the commercial transfer of cannabis or cannabis products to a customer. “Delivery” also includes the use by a retailer of any technology platform.

(w) “Department” means the Department of Cannabis Control within the Business and Consumer Services Agency.

(x) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Cannabis Control.

(y) “Distribution” means the procurement, sale, and transport of cannabis and cannabis products between licensees.

(z) “Distributor” means a licensee that is authorized to engage in the distribution of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products.

(aa) “Dried flower” means all dead cannabis that has been harvested, dried, cured, or otherwise processed, excluding leaves and stems.

(ab) “Edible cannabis product” means
 a cannabis product that is intended to be used, in whole or in part, for human or animal consumption, including, but not limited to, chewing gum, but excluding products set forth in Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501) of the Food and Agricultural Code. An edible cannabis product is not considered food, as defined by Section 109935 of the Health and Safety Code, a processed pet food, as defined by Section 113025 of the Health and Safety Code, or a drug, as defined by Section 109925 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ac) “Fund” means the Cannabis Control Fund established pursuant to Section 26210.

(ad) “Industrial hemp” has the same meaning as in Section 11018.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ae) “Kind” means applicable type or designation regarding a particular cannabis variant, origin, or product type,
 including, but not limited to, strain name, trademark, or production area designation.

(af) “Labeling” means any label or other written, printed, or graphic matter upon a cannabis or cannabis product, upon its container or wrapper, or that accompanies any cannabis or cannabis product.

(ag) “Labor peace agreement” means an agreement between a licensee and any bona fide labor organization that, at a minimum, protects the state’s proprietary interests by prohibiting labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference with the applicant’s business. This agreement means that the applicant has agreed not to disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the applicant’s employees. The agreement shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at
 reasonable times to areas in which the applicant’s employees work, for the purpose of meeting with employees to discuss their right to representation, employment rights under state law, and terms and conditions of employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a particular method of election or certification of the bona fide labor organization.

(ah) “License” means a state license issued under this division, and includes both an A-license and an M-license, as well as a testing laboratory license.

(ai) “Licensed market” means the California licensed market for cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products that is subject to regulation by this division.

(aj) “Licensee” means any person holding a license under this division, regardless of whether the license held is an A-license or an M-license, and includes
 the holder of a testing laboratory license.

(ak) “Licensing authority” means the department and any state agency currently or formerly responsible for the issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of the license, or the state agency authorized to take disciplinary action against the licensee.

(al) “Live plants” means living cannabis flowers and plants, including seeds, immature plants, and vegetative stage plants.

(am) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county.

(an) “Lot” means a batch or a specifically identified portion of a batch.

(ao) “M-license” means a state license issued under this division for commercial cannabis activity involving medicinal cannabis.

(ap) “M-licensee” means any person holding a license under this division for commercial cannabis activity involving medicinal cannabis.

(aq) “Manufacture” means to compound, blend, extract, infuse, package, label, or otherwise make or prepare a cannabis product.

(ar) “Medicinal cannabis” or “medicinal cannabis product” means cannabis or a cannabis product, respectively, intended to be sold or donated for use pursuant to the Compassionate Use Act of 1996 (Proposition 215), found in Section 11362.5 of the Health and Safety Code, by a medicinal cannabis patient in California who possesses a physician’s recommendation, or in compliance with any compassionate use, equity, or other similar program administered by a local jurisdiction.

(as) “Microbusiness” means
 a licensee that is authorized to engage in cultivation of cannabis on an area less than 10,000 square feet and to act as a licensed distributor, Level 1 manufacturer, and retailer under this division, provided such licensee can demonstrate compliance with all requirements imposed by this division on licensed cultivators, distributors, Level 1 manufacturers, and retailers to the extent the licensee engages in such activities.

(at) “Nursery” means a licensee that produces only clones, immature plants, seeds, and other agricultural products used specifically for the propagation and cultivation of cannabis.

(au) “Operation” means any act for which licensure is required under the provisions of this division, or any commercial transfer of cannabis or cannabis products.

(av) “Owner” means any of the following:

(1) A person with an aggregate ownership interest of 20 percent or more in the person applying for a license or a licensee, unless the interest is solely a security, lien, or encumbrance.

(2) The chief executive officer of a nonprofit or other entity.

(3) A member of the board of directors of a nonprofit.

(4) An individual who will be participating in the direction, control, or management of the person applying for a license.

(aw) “Package” means any container or receptacle used for holding cannabis or cannabis products.

(ax) “Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation, limited
 liability company, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular.

(ay) “Physician’s recommendation” means a recommendation by a physician and surgeon that a patient use cannabis provided in accordance with the Compassionate Use Act of 1996 (Proposition 215), found at Section 11362.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(az) “Premises” means the designated structure or structures and land specified in the application that is owned, leased, or otherwise held under the control of the applicant or licensee where the commercial cannabis activity will be or is conducted.

(ba) “Primary caregiver” has the same meaning as in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(bb) “Processor” means a person authorized to engage in only trimming, drying, curing, grading, packaging, and labeling of cannabis and nonmanufactured cannabis products.

(bc) “Purchaser” means the customer who is engaged in a transaction with a licensee for purposes of obtaining cannabis or cannabis products.

(bd) “Retailer” means a person authorized to engage in the retail sale and delivery of cannabis or cannabis products to customers.

(be) “Sell,” “sale,” and “to sell” include any transaction whereby, for any consideration, title to cannabis or cannabis products is transferred from one person to another, and includes the delivery of cannabis or cannabis products pursuant to an order placed for the purchase of the same and soliciting or receiving an order for the same, but does not include the return
 of cannabis or cannabis products by a licensee to the licensee from whom the cannabis or cannabis product was purchased.

(bf) “Synthetic cannabinoid” means a cannabinoid or cannabinoid-like compound that is produced by using biosynthesis, bioconversion, or chemical synthesis, reaction, modification, conversion, or a similar process. This includes, but is not limited to, any form of tetrahydrocannabinol that was produced by the conversion of cannabidiol (CBD) (CAS number 13956-29-1), or any other chemical substance identified by the department in regulation. Synthetic cannabinoid does not include any of the following:

(1) A cannabinoid produced by the decarboxylation of acidic phytocannabinoids without the use of chemical reagents or chemical catalysts. This includes, but is not limited to, the conversion of cannabidiolic acid (CBDA) into cannabidiol (CBD) without the use of
 chemical reagents or catalysts.

(2) A cannabinoid that occurs naturally in the Cannabis sativa Linnaeus, Cannabis indica, or Cannabis ruderalis plant that was produced with the use of heat, light, or pressure from other phytocannabinoids, and without the use of any chemical reagents or catalysts. This includes, but is not limited to, the conversion of tetrahydrocannabinol into cannabinol (CBN) with the use of heat, light, or pressure, and without the use of any chemical reagents or catalysts.

(3) Any other chemical substance identified by the department in regulation.

(bg) “Testing laboratory” means a laboratory, facility, or entity in the state that offers or performs tests of cannabis or cannabis products and that is both of the following:

(1) Accredited by an accrediting body that is independent from all other persons involved in commercial cannabis activity in the state.

(2) Licensed by the department.

(bh) “Unique identifier” means an alphanumeric code or designation used in reference to a specific quantity of cannabis or cannabis products that is issued pursuant to the track and trace program established by the department.

(bi) “Youth center” has the same meaning as in Section 11353.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(bj) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 7.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.

(a) This division does not apply to any product containing cannabinoids that has been approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that has either been placed on a schedule of the federal Controlled Substances Act other than Schedule I or has been exempted from one or more provisions of that act, and that is intended for prescribed use for the treatment of a medical condition.

(b) This division does not apply to activity performed pursuant to a registration with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration pursuant to Part 1318 (commencing with Section 1318.01) of Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as it read on January 19, 2021, provided that
 the person engaging in the activity provides the licensing authority valid documentation of their registration with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration and the location where the activity will be performed prior to engaging in the activity.

(c) This division does not apply to products that are regulated pursuant to and meet the requirements of the Sherman Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 109875) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety
 Code), including products that do not contain cannabinoids other than CBD isolate.

(d) This division does not permit the introduction into the licensed market of cannabis concentrate or cannabis products derived in whole or in part from industrial hemp that have been manufactured without a cannabis manufacturing license, as required by this division.

(e) Cannabis concentrates and cannabis products are not considered food, as defined by Section 109935 of the Health and Safety Code, a processed pet food, as defined by Section 113025 of the Health and Safety Code, or a drug, as defined by Section 109925 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 4.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Administration [26010. - 26018.]

26010.

(a) There is in the Business and Consumer Services Agency, the Department of Cannabis Control under the supervision and control of a director. The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this division related to the department.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 8.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26010.5.

(a) The Governor shall appoint the director of the department, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The director shall serve under the direction and supervision of the Secretary of Business and Consumer Service and at the pleasure of the Governor.

(b) Every power granted to or duty imposed upon the director under this division may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy or assistant director or by a chief, subject to conditions and limitations that the director may prescribe.

(c) (1) The director may employ and appoint all employees necessary to properly administer the work of the department, in accordance with civil service laws and regulations.

(2) The Governor may also appoint a chief deputy director, a deputy director of equity and inclusion, and either a deputy director of legal
 affairs or a chief counsel to the department. These positions shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director and hold office at the pleasure of the Governor.

(d) The department has the power, duty, purpose, responsibility, and jurisdiction to regulate commercial cannabis activity as provided in this division.

(e) Upon the effective date of this section, whenever any reference to the “Medical Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act,” “Medical Marijuana Regulation and Safety Act,” or former Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 19300) of Division 8 appears in any statute, regulation, contract, or in any other code, it shall be construed to refer to this division as it relates to medicinal cannabis and medicinal cannabis products.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 9.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26010.6.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and except as provided in subdivision (c), the Department of Cannabis Control shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for an employee, prospective employee, contractor, or subcontractor whose duties include or would include access to criminal offender record
 information, as defined in Section 11075 of the Penal Code, contained in the information systems or records of the Department of Cannabis Control or access to cannabis, cannabis products, or other controlled substances listed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, except for peace officer employees and prospective peace officer employees.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the Department of Cannabis Control shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all peace officer employees and prospective peace officer employees of the department.
 The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to employees hired on or before June 30, 2023, or to any contract entered into on or before June 30, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 4.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26010.7.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 26062 and 26063 and Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 26240), on and after the operative date of this section, the Department of Cannabis Control and the director shall succeed to and be vested with all the duties, powers, purposes, functions, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Bureau of Cannabis Control, also formerly known as the Bureau of Medical Cannabis Regulation and the Bureau of Medical Marijuana Regulation under the former Medical Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act (former Chapter 3.5 commencing with Section 19300 of Division 8), the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture, as provided for pursuant to this division as it read on the day before the operative date of this section.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 26062 and 26063 and Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 26240), on and after the operative date of this section, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Whenever “Bureau of Marijuana Control,” “Bureau of Medical Cannabis Regulation,” or “Bureau of Medical Marijuana Regulation” appears in any statute, regulation, or contract, or in any other code, it shall be construed to refer to the Department of Cannabis Control.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, whenever “Department of Public Health,” “State Department of Public Health,” “Department of Food and Agriculture,” or “California Department of Food and Agriculture” appears in this division, or any statute, regulation, or contract, related to regulation of cannabis pursuant to this division, it shall be construed to refer to
 the Department of Cannabis Control.

(c) Any regulation, order, or other action adopted, prescribed, taken, or performed by the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, or the Department of Food and Agriculture under this division in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this section shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed, or until they expire by their own terms, and shall be deemed to be a regulation, order, or action of the Department of Cannabis Control. On and after the operative date of this section, any proposed regulation noticed by, or submitted to the Office of Administrative Law by, the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, or the Department of Food and Agriculture under this division, shall be deemed to be a regulation noticed by or submitted by the Department of Cannabis Control.

(d) Any action by or against the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, or the Department of Food and Agriculture pertaining to matters vested in the Department of Cannabis Control by this section shall not abate but shall continue in the name of the Department of Cannabis Control, and the Department of Cannabis Control shall be substituted for the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture by the court wherein the action is pending. The substitution shall not in any way affect the rights of the parties to the action.

(e) On and after the operative date of this section, all books, documents, forms, records, data systems, and property of the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the Department of Consumer Affairs, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture
 pertaining to functions transferred to the Department of Cannabis Control shall be transferred to the Department of Cannabis Control.

(f) On and after the operative date of this section, positions filled by appointment by the Governor in the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture whose principal assignment was to perform functions transferred pursuant to this section shall be transferred to the Department of Cannabis Control. Individuals in positions transferred pursuant to this subdivision shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Salaries of positions transferred shall remain at the level established pursuant to law unless otherwise provided. Individuals in positions transferred pursuant to this subdivision who have been previously confirmed by the Senate shall not be required to undergo a new confirmation as a result of this transfer. Titles of positions transferred
 pursuant to this subdivision shall be determined by the director with the approval of the Governor.

(g) On and after the operative date of this section, every officer and employee of the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Food and Agriculture, and the Department of Consumer Affairs who is performing a function transferred to the Department of Cannabis Control and who is serving in the state civil service, including an excluded or temporary employee, shall be transferred to the Department of Cannabis Control pursuant to the provisions of Section 19050.9 of the Government Code. The status, position, and rights of any officer or employee of the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Food and Agriculture, and the Department of Consumer Affairs shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by the person as an officer or employee of the
 Department of Cannabis Control, as applicable, pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except for a position that is exempt from civil service. The personnel records of all transferred employees shall be transferred to the Department of Cannabis Control.
